District of Columbia statutes.
38-304

Authority not affected by Reorganization Plan; delegation of functions; § 38-161 to remain in full force and effect.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to affect the authority vested in the Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952 (66 Stat. 824). The performance of any function vested by this chapter in the Commissioners of the District of Columbia or in any office or agency under the jurisdiction and control of said Commissioners may be delegated by said Commissioners in accordance with § 3 of such Plan.

(b)

This chapter shall not be construed as superseding § 38-161, and such section shall continue in full force and effect.

History

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 854, Pub. L. 86-725, § 5

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 38-305.
1981 Ed., § 31-605.
1973 Ed., § 31-310.

Editor's Notes

Former § 38-304 has been recodified as § 38-301.